Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB384.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Keystone Opportunity Dairy Zone Act.Section 102. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Dairy farmers are a vital, integral and irreplaceable part of the agricultural heritage of this Commonwealth.(2) Dairy farmers contribute to the continued economic health of this Commonwealth's agricultural sector, provide jobs and pay taxes, provide local and sustainable food products for nourishment and enjoyment and promote the preservation of farmland in the public interest of all residents of this Commonwealth.(3) The continued viability of dairy farming is in the best interest of the residents of this Commonwealth.20250SB0384PN0395 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) In light of continued economic forces and market pressures, the long-term viability of dairy farming requires coordinated efforts by private and public entities to ensure economic viability and ensure the continuation of the significant contributions dairy farmers make to the economic and social life of this Commonwealth.(5) The long-term economic viability of dairy farming requires the cooperative involvement of residents, businesses, State and local elected officials and community organizations.(6) It is in the best interest of this Commonwealth to assist and encourage the creation of zones to accomplish the purposes of this act.Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A resident or business that submits or intends to submit a zone application to the department."Business." An association, partnership, cooperative, corporation, sole proprietorship, limited liability company or employer."Dairy processing facility." A factory or plant directly and primarily involved in processing, refining or manufacturing raw milk which is at least 75% Pennsylvania milk or Pennsylvania milk products into milk, butter, milk powder, cheese, yogurt, ice cream, sour cream or a value-added dairy product intended for the wholesale or retail market."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.20250SB0384PN0395 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Domicile." The place where a resident has a true and fixed home and principal establishment for an indefinite time and to which, whenever absent, that resident intends to return. Domicile continues until another place of domicile is established."Keystone opportunity dairy zone." A defined geographic area comprised of one or more qualified political subdivisions or portions of qualified political subdivisions as designated by the department under section 301."Opportunity plan." A written plan that meets the requirements and addresses the criteria under section 302 and 304."Pennsylvania dairy farm." A farm that produces Pennsylvania milk."Pennsylvania milk." Raw milk produced by the milking of cows physically located on a farm within the geographic boundaries of this Commonwealth and certified by the Pennsylvania Milk Marketing Board."Pennsylvania milk product." A food or beverage made from or primarily made from at least 75% Pennsylvania milk, or a value-added dairy product, processed within this Commonwealth, which utilized 75% or more Pennsylvania milk in its manufacture."Political subdivision." A county, city, borough, township, town or school district with taxing jurisdiction in a defined geographic area within this Commonwealth."Qualified business." A business incorporated under the laws of this Commonwealth and authorized to do business in this Commonwealth that owns or leases real property in a zone from which the qualified business actively operates a dairy processing facility or small scale dairy processing facility as 20250SB0384PN0395 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certified by the department."Qualified political subdivision." A political subdivision which has real property within its jurisdiction which has been designated by the department as a zone."Resident." A resident who is domiciled and resides in an area that is designated a zone."Small scale dairy processing facility." A factory, plant or operation that exclusively utilizes Pennsylvania milk produced from a single Pennsylvania dairy farm with a total average herd size of 250 milking cows or fewer, or a combination of Pennsylvania dairy farms with a total collective average herd size of 250 milking cows or fewer, and that is directly and primarily involved in processing, refining or manufacturing raw Pennsylvania milk or Pennsylvania milk products into milk, butter, milk powder, cheese, yogurt, ice cream, sour cream or a value-added dairy product intended for the wholesale or retail market."Subzone." A parcel within an authorized zone."Tax Reform Code of 1971." The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Value-added dairy product." Pennsylvania milk or a Pennsylvania milk product that has been additionally processed, improved, shredded, combined, aged, flavored, separated, condensed or otherwise prepared to provide additional value or convenience for the wholesale or retail market."Zone." A keystone opportunity dairy zone.CHAPTER 3KEYSTONE OPPORTUNITY DAIRY ZONESSection 301. Keystone opportunity dairy zones.(a) Establishment.--The department may designate up to 30 20250SB0384PN0395 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 zones in accordance with this section, with up to 15 Class A zones and up to 20 Class B zones.(b) Zone authorization.--The department shall authorize not more than 30 zones in this Commonwealth. Residents and businesses within an authorized zone that are qualified under this act shall be entitled to all tax exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits provided under this act for a period not to exceed 10 years beginning no sooner than one year from the effective date of this subsection and no later than three years from the effective date of this subsection. The department shall, upon approval, specify the precise beginning and ending dates for the tax exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits provided under this act.(c) Authorization for local tax exemption.--Each political subdivision within which a proposed zone is located, whether in whole or in part, is authorized to provide tax exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits to residents and qualified businesses under this act. The political subdivision shall agree to provide exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits from all local taxes provided under this act in order to qualify to be designated a zone. The exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits shall be effective on the date determined by the department. The exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits shall be binding upon the qualified political subdivision for the duration of the zone designation.(d) Authorization to extend the duration of a zone.--The political subdivision or subdivisions comprising a zone may request to extend the designation for a period of three years. The request to extend a zone designation shall be made on a zone-by-zone basis. A qualified political subdivision having an 20250SB0384PN0395 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approved zone within its jurisdiction and seeking to extend the zone designation shall pass the required ordinances, resolutions or other required action of the qualified political subdivision for the necessary exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits under this act, and shall submit copies of the ordinance, resolution or other action to the department. The department may grant the request to extend the duration of the designation of the zone provided all the proper binding ordinances, resolutions or other governing documents are passed by all qualified political subdivisions within the zone extending the necessary exemptions, deductions, abatements and credits to the entire zone. The department shall approve or deny the request for extension of duration of a subzone within 90 days of receipt, and shall provide written notice, irrespective of whether approved or denied, to each qualified applicant, qualified political subdivision, resident and qualified business affected. Upon approval of a request for extension of duration of a zone, the exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits shall be binding upon the qualified political subdivision as provided in subsection (c).Section 302. Application.(a) Initial application.--An applicant may apply to the department to designate a parcel as a zone.(b) Content.--The application shall contain the following:(1) The geographic area of the proposed zone, including the specific political subdivision or subdivisions.(2) An opportunity plan that shall include the following:(i) A detailed map of the proposed zone, including geographic boundaries, total area and present use and 20250SB0384PN0395 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conditions of the land and structures of the proposed zone.(ii) Evidence of support from and participation of local government, school districts and other educational institutions, business groups, community organizations and the public.(iii) A detailed proposal outlining the proposed improvements in the zone, including proposed capital investment, job creation and increased dairy processing capacity for Pennsylvania milk or Pennsylvania milk products according to the specifications of this act.(iv) A description of anticipated activity in the proposed zone, including site improvements.(v) Evidence of potential private and public investment in the proposed zone.(vi) The role of the proposed zone in economic development of the dairy industry in this Commonwealth and the anticipated impacts to dairy farmers producing Pennsylvania milk.(vii) Any other information deemed appropriate by the department or by the Secretary of Agriculture in consultation with the department.(3) The duration of the proposed zone, including the anticipated beginning and end date.(4) A formal, binding ordinance or resolution passed by each political subdivision in which the proposed zone is located that specifically provides for all local tax exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits for businesses provided in this act.(5) Evidence that the proposed zone meets the required 20250SB0384PN0395 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 criteria under this act.Section 303. Review.(a) Action of department.--The department, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture, shall review all completed applications submitted under section 302. An application for authorization as a zone must be received by a date to be determined by the department in order to be considered by the department. The date to be determined by the department shall not be sooner than 120 days after the effective date of this subsection, nor later than two years after the effective date of this subsection.(b) Process.--The department shall authorize up to 30 zones from applications meeting the criteria under section 304 based upon need, likelihood of success, potential for increased dairy processing capacity and overall impact on the market for Pennsylvania milk or Pennsylvania milk products. The department may not alter the geographic boundaries of a zone described in an application unless mutually agreed upon between the department, the applicant and any affected local municipality. The department shall not deny an application due to an applicant's prior receipt of or consideration for any other State community and economic development program funding.(c) Authorizations.--Any zone approved shall be approved no later than three years after the effective date of this subsection.Section 304. Criteria for authorization of zone.(a) Class A zones.--(1) A Class A zone shall:(i) Be not less than five acres, unless contiguous to or colocated with an existing or proposed dairy 20250SB0384PN0395 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 processing facility.(ii) Be not more than 150 acres.(2) In order to qualify for authorization as a Class A zone under this section, an application shall:(i) Provide specific geographic information on the proposed zone location.(ii) Show anticipated private investment of $10,000,000 or more in a dairy processing facility.(iii) Create 25 or more new jobs as defined by the department.(iv) Demonstrate an exceptional and meaningful opportunity for the expansion of dairy processing capacity within this Commonwealth.(b) Class B zones.--A Class B zone shall:(1) Be not less than five acres, unless contiguous to or colocated with an existing or proposed dairy processing facility.(2) Be not more than 25 acres, unless colocated with a Pennsylvania dairy farm directly supplying Pennsylvania milk for an existing or proposed small scale dairy processing facility.(3) In order to qualify for authorization as a Class B zone under this section, an application shall:(i) Provide specific geographic information on the proposed zone location.(ii) Show anticipated private investment of $100,000 or more in a small scale dairy processing facility.(iii) Demonstrate an exceptional and meaningful opportunity for the expansion of small scale, boutique or locally based dairy processing capacity within this 20250SB0384PN0395 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.Section 305. Zone limitations.A zone shall not encompass an entire political subdivision.Section 306. Residency.In order to qualify each year for a tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act, a resident shall be domiciled and shall reside in a zone for a period of 184 consecutive days during each taxable year.Section 307. Annual certification.(a) Qualification.--In order to qualify each year for a tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act, a qualified business shall obtain annual renewal of the certification from the department.(b) Requirements.--For a class zone, the following shall apply:(1) For a Class A zone, the certification form shall include at least the following:(i) The duration of the zone designation.(ii) The number of jobs created.(iii) The number of jobs retained.(iv) The amount of capital investment.(v) The gross value of Pennsylvania milk products produced in the past year.(vi) The percentage of Pennsylvania milk utilized in the production of Pennsylvania milk products.(vii) Any other information, conditions or requirements reasonably required by the department.(2) For a Class B zone, the certification form shall include all of the following:(i) The duration of the zone designation.20250SB0384PN0395 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The gross value of Pennsylvania milk products produced in the past year.(iii) Any other information, conditions or requirements required by the department.Section 308. Forms.Applications for authorization as a zone shall be on forms prescribed by the department. The department shall make application forms available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, or upon request by a potential applicant, on paper forms or other method as determined by the department.CHAPTER 5STATE TAXESSUBCHAPTER AGENERAL PROVISIONSSection 501. State taxes.(a) Receipt and expiration.--A resident who is a resident of, or a qualified business located in, a zone shall receive the exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits as provided in this chapter and Chapter 7 for the duration of the zone designation. Exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits shall expire on the date of expiration of the zone.(b) Construction.--The Department of Revenue shall administer, construe and enforce the provisions of this chapter in conjunction with Articles II, III, IV, VI, VII, IX and XV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.SUBCHAPTER BPARTICULAR STATE TAXESSection 511. Sales and use tax.Sales at retail of services or tangible personal property, 20250SB0384PN0395 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other than motor vehicles, to a qualified business or a construction contractor under a construction contract with a qualified business, landowner or lessee for the exclusive use, consumption and utilization of the tangible personal property or service by the qualified business at the qualified business's, landowner's or lessee's facility located within a zone are exempt from the sales and use tax imposed under Article II of the Tax Reform Code of 1971. An exemption shall not be permitted for sales conducted prior to designation of the real property as part of a zone.Section 512. Personal income tax.(a) Exemptions.--A resident shall be allowed an exemption for:(1) Compensation received during the time period when the resident was a resident of a zone.(2) (i) Net income from the operation of a qualified business received by a resident or nonresident of a zone attributable to business activity conducted within a zone, determined in accordance with section 514.(ii) A business that operates both within and outside this Commonwealth, before computing the business's zone exemption, shall first determine the business's Pennsylvania activity over the activity everywhere by applying the three-factor apportionment formula as provided in Department of Revenue personal income tax regulations applicable to income apportionment in connection with a business, trade or profession carried on both within and outside this Commonwealth.(3) All of the following:(i) Net gains or income, less net losses, derived by 20250SB0384PN0395 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a resident or nonresident of a zone from the sale, exchange or other disposition of real or tangible personal property located in a zone as determined in accordance with accepted accounting principles and practices. The following shall apply:(A) The exemption under this subparagraph shall not apply to the sale, exchange or other disposition of any stock of goods, merchandise or inventory or any operational assets unless the transfer is in connection with the sale, exchange or other disposition of all of the assets in complete liquidation of a qualified business located in a zone.(B) This subparagraph shall apply to intangible personal property employed in a trade, profession or business in a zone only when transferred in connection with a sale, exchange or other disposition of all of the assets in complete liquidation of the qualified business in the zone.(ii) Net gains, less net losses, realized by a resident of a zone from the sale, exchange or disposition of intangible personal property or obligations issued on or after February 1, 1994, by the Commonwealth, a public authority, commission, board or other Commonwealth agency, political subdivision or authority created by a political subdivision or by the Federal Government as determined in accordance with accepted accounting principles and practices.(iii) The exemption from income for gain or loss provided for in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) shall be 20250SB0384PN0395 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prorated based on the following:(A) In the case of gains, less net losses, in subparagraph (i), the percentage of time, based on calendar days, the property located in a zone was held by a resident or nonresident of the zone during the time period the zone was in effect in relation to the total time the property was held.(B) In the case of gains, less net losses, in subparagraph (ii), the percentage of time, based on calendar days, the property was held by the taxpayer while a resident of a zone in relation to the total time the property was held.(4) Net gains or income derived from or in the form of rents received by a resident, whether a resident or nonresident of a zone, to the extent that income or loss from the rental of real or tangible personal property is allocable to a zone. For purposes of calculating this exemption:(i) Net rents derived from real or tangible personal property located in a zone are allocable to a zone.(ii) If the tangible personal property was used both within and without the zone during the taxable year, only the net income attributable to use in the zone is exempt. The net rental income shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days the property was used in the zone and the denominator of which is the total days of use.(5) Dividends received during the time the resident was a resident of a zone.(6) Interest received during the time period the resident was a resident of a zone.20250SB0384PN0395 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Pass-through entities.--The exemptions provided for in subsection (a)(2), (3)(i) and (4) shall apply to all of the following:(1) The income or gain of a partnership or association. The partner or member shall be entitled to the exemptions under this section for the partner's or member's share, whether or not distributed, of the income or gain received by the partnership or association for its taxable year.(2) The income or gain of a Subchapter S corporation. The shareholder shall be entitled to the exemptions under this section for the shareholder's pro rata share, whether or not distributed, of the income or gain received by the corporation for its taxable year ending within or with the shareholder's taxable year.(c) Limitation.--A partnership, association, Subchapter S corporation, cooperative, resident or nonresident may not apply an exemption from income under this act for any class of income against any other classes of income or gain. A partnership, association, Subchapter S corporation, cooperative, resident or nonresident may not carry back or carry forward any exemption under this act from year to year. The credit allowed under this section shall not exceed the tax liability of the taxpayer under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for the tax year.Section 513. Residency considerations.If a resident completes the residency requirements under section 306 or if a nonresident realizes income attributable to business activity or property within a zone, the resident may claim the exemptions from income for the items provided under section 512 for that portion of the tax year that the resident was a resident or for that portion of the tax year during which 20250SB0384PN0395 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the area is designated as a zone.Section 514. Corporate net income tax.(a) Credits.--For the tax years that begin on or after January 1, 2025, a corporation that is a qualified business under this act may claim a credit against the tax imposed by Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for tax liability attributable to business activity conducted within the zone in the taxable year. A credit may not be claimed for activities conducted prior to designation of the real property as part of a zone. The business activity must be conducted directly by a corporation in the zone in order for the corporation to claim the tax credit.(b) Tax liability determinations.--The corporate tax liability attributable to business activity conducted within a zone shall be determined by multiplying the corporation's taxable income that is attributable to business activity conducted within the zone by the rate of tax imposed under Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for the taxable year.(c) Determinations of attributable tax liability.--Tax liability attributable to business activity conducted within a zone shall be computed, construed, administered and enforced in conformity with Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 and with specific reference to the following:(1) If the entire business of the corporation in this Commonwealth is transacted wholly within the zone, the taxable income attributable to business activity within a zone shall consist of the Pennsylvania taxable income as determined under Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(2) If the entire business of the corporation in this Commonwealth is not transacted wholly within the zone, the 20250SB0384PN0395 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 taxable income of a corporation in a zone shall be determined by the portion of the Pennsylvania taxable income of the corporation attributable to business activity conducted within the zone and apportioned in accordance with subsection (d).(d) Income apportionment.--The taxable income of a corporation that is a qualified business shall be apportioned to the zone by multiplying the Pennsylvania taxable income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor and the denominator of which is two, in accordance with the following:(1) The property factor:(i) is a fraction, the numerator of which is the average value of the taxpayer's real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in the zone during the tax period and the denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer's real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in this Commonwealth during the tax period; and(ii) shall not include the security interest of any corporation as seller or lessor in personal property sold or leased under a conditional sale, bailment lease, chattel mortgage or other contract providing for the retention of a lien or title as security for the sales price of the property.(2) (i) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total amount paid in the zone during the tax period by the taxpayer for compensation and the denominator of which is the total compensation paid in this Commonwealth during the tax period.20250SB0384PN0395 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Compensation is paid in the zone if:(A) the resident's service is performed entirely within the zone;(B) the resident's service is performed both within and without the zone, and the service performed without the zone is incidental to the resident's service within the zone; or(C) some of the service is performed in the zone and the base of operations or, if there is no base of operations, the place from which the service is directed or controlled is in the zone, or the base of operations or the place from which the service is directed or controlled is not in any location in which some part of the service is performed, and the resident's residence is in the zone.(e) Computation.--A corporation shall compute the corporation's Commonwealth taxable income in conformity with Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 with no adjustments or subtractions for zone taxable income.(f) Limitation on amount of credit.--The credit allowed under this section shall not exceed the tax liability of the taxpayer under Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for the tax year.(g) Limitation on applicability.--(1) Any portion of the taxpayer's taxable income that is attributable to the operation of any of the following may not be used to calculate a credit under this section:(i) A corporation that qualifies as a regulated investment company under Article IV of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.20250SB0384PN0395 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) A holding company as the term is used in Article VI of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(2) The prohibition under paragraph (1) shall not apply to the portion of a qualified business engaged in manufacturing or processing.CHAPTER 7LOCAL TAXESSection 701. Local taxes.Each qualified political subdivision shall exempt, deduct, abate or credit local taxes in accordance with ordinances and resolutions adopted under section 301(c), as is applicable. Failure to exempt, deduct, abate or credit local taxes shall result in the revocation of the zone designation.Section 702. Real property tax.(a) Abatement.--Notwithstanding the act of May 22, 1933 (P.L.853, No.155), known as The General County Assessment Law, and 53 Pa.C.S. (relating to municipalities generally), each qualified political subdivision shall by ordinance or resolution abate 100% of the real property taxation on the assessed valuation of property in an area designated as a zone within this Commonwealth during the taxable years determined by the department. The real property tax abatement under this section shall apply to all real property located in a zone, irrespective of the business activity, if any, made of the realty by the owner, when this act is in effect. An abatement may not be provided prior to designation of a zone by the department.(b) Interest and penalties.--If the department or a political subdivision finds that a resident or business claimed an abatement of real property tax to which the resident or business was not entitled under this act, the resident or 20250SB0384PN0395 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 business shall be liable for the abated taxes and subject to the applicable interest and penalty provisions provided by law.(c) Calculations for education subsidy for school districts.--In determining the market value of real property in each school district, the State Tax Equalization Board shall exclude any increase in value above the base value prior to the effect of the abatement of local taxes to the extent and during the period of time that real estate tax revenues attributable to the increased value are not available to the school district for general school district purposes.Section 703. Local earned income and net profits taxes and business privilege taxes.(a) Exemption.--(1) If a political subdivision has enacted a tax on the privilege of engaging in a business or profession, measured by gross receipts or on a flat rate basis, earned income or net profits, as used in the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax Enabling Act, imposed within the boundaries of a zone, the qualified political subdivision shall exempt the following from the imposition or operation of the local tax ordinances, statutes, regulations or otherwise:(i) The business gross receipts for operations conducted by a qualified business within a zone.(ii) The earned income received by a resident of a zone.(iii) The net profits of a qualified business attributable to business activity conducted within a zone when imposed by the qualified political subdivision where the qualified business is located.20250SB0384PN0395 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) An exemption may not be granted for operations conducted, for earned income received or for activities conducted prior to designation of the real property as part of a zone.(b) Additional exemptions.--(1) Paragraph (2) shall apply if a qualified political subdivision has enacted a tax on the privilege of engaging in a profession or business, on wages or compensation, on net profits from the operation of a business or profession or other activity or on the occupancy or use of real property under any of the following:(i) The act of August 5, 1932 (Sp.Sess., P.L.45, No.45), referred to as the Sterling Act.(ii) The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(iii) The act of August 24, 1961 (P.L.1135, No.508), referred to as the First Class A School District Earned Income Tax Act.(iv) The act of August 9, 1963 (P.L.640, No.338), entitled "An act empowering cities of the first class, coterminous with school districts of the first class, to authorize the boards of public education of such school districts to impose certain additional taxes for school district purposes, and providing for the levy, assessment and collection of such taxes."(v) The act of May 30, 1984 (P.L.345, No.69), known as the First Class City Business Tax Reform Act.(vi) The act of June 5, 1991 (P.L.9, No.6), known as the Pennsylvania Intergovernmental Cooperation Authority Act for Cities of the First Class.20250SB0384PN0395 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If there is an enactment under paragraph (1), the qualified political subdivision shall provide an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit from the imposition and operation of the local tax ordinance or resolution for all of the following:(i) The privilege of engaging in a business or profession within a zone by a resident or qualified business, whether a resident or nonresident of the zone.(ii) Salaries, wages, commissions, compensation or other income received for services rendered or work performed by a resident of a zone.(iii) The gross or net income or gross or net profits realized from the operation of a qualified business to the extent attributable to business activity conducted within a zone.(iv) The occupancy or use of real property located within the zone.(c) Calculation for education subsidy for school district.--In determining the personal income valuation of a school district, the Secretary of Revenue shall exclude any increase in the personal income valuation as defined in section 2501(9.1) of the Public School Code of 1949, above the base value prior to the abatement of local taxes in a zone located within the school district to the extent and during the period of time that personal income revenues attributable to the increase in the personal income valuation are not available to the school district for general school district purposes. An exemption under this section may not be granted to a resident or qualified business prior to designation of the real property as part of a zone.20250SB0384PN0395 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Determination of exemption.--For the purposes of determining an exemption under this section, a tax on or measured by any of the following shall be attributed to business activity conducted within a zone by applying the apportionment factors under section 514(d):(1) Business gross receipts.(2) Gross or net income.(3) Gross or net profits.Section 704. Mercantile license tax.A resident or qualified business in a zone shall not be required to pay any fee authorized under a mercantile license tax imposed under the act of June 20, 1947 (P.L.745, No.320), entitled "An act to provide revenue for school districts of the first Class A by imposing a temporary mercantile license tax on persons engaging in certain occupations and businesses therein; providing for its levy and collection; for the issuance of mercantile licenses upon the payment of fees therefor; conferring and imposing powers and duties on boards of public education, receivers of school taxes and school treasurers in such districts; saving certain ordinances of council of certain cities, and providing compensation for certain officers, and employes and imposing penalties."Section 705. Local sales and use tax.(a) Sales and use tax exemption.--A political subdivision shall exempt sales at retail of services or tangible personal property, except motor vehicles, to a qualified business or a construction contractor under a construction contract with a qualified business, landowner or lessee for the exclusive use, consumption and utilization of the tangible personal property or service by the qualified business at the qualified business's, 20250SB0384PN0395 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 landowner's or lessee's facility located within a zone from a city or county tax on purchase price authorized under Article XXXI-B of the act of July 28, 1953 (P.L.723, No.230), known as the Second Class County Code and the act of June 5, 1991 (P.L.9, No.6), known as the Pennsylvania Intergovernmental Cooperation Authority Act for Cities of the First Class. An exemption may not be granted for sales occurring prior to designation of the real property as part of a zone.(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the phrase "sales at retail of services or tangible personal property" shall be as the phrase "sales at retail" is used under Article II of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.CHAPTER 9ADMINISTRATION OF TAX PROVISIONSSection 901. Transferability.Any exemption, deduction, abatement or credit provided to a resident or qualified business under Chapter 5 or 7 is nontransferable and cannot be applied, used or assigned to any other resident, business or tax account.Section 902. Recapture.(a) Repayment to State and political subdivision.--If a qualified business located within a zone has received an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act and subsequently relocates outside of the zone within the first nine years of locating in a zone, the qualified business shall refund to the State and political subdivision which granted the exemption, deduction, abatement or credit received in accordance with the following:(1) If a qualified business relocates within five years from the date of first locating in a zone, 66% of all the 20250SB0384PN0395 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits attributed to that qualified business's participation in the zone shall be refunded to the Commonwealth and the political subdivision.(2) If a qualified business relocates between five to nine years from the date of first locating in a zone, 33% of all exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits attributed to that qualified business's participation in the zone shall be refunded to the Commonwealth and the political subdivision.(b) Waiver.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, the Secretary of Agriculture and the political subdivision, may waive or modify recapture requirements under this section if the department determines that the business relocation was due to circumstances beyond the control of the business, including:(1) natural disaster;(2) unforeseen industry trends; or(3) loss of a major supplier or market.Section 903. Delinquent or deficient State or local taxes.(a) Residents.--A resident may not claim or receive an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act unless that resident is in full compliance with all State and local tax laws, ordinances and resolutions.(b) Qualified business.--(1) A qualified business may not claim or receive an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act unless that qualified business is in full compliance with all State and local tax laws, ordinances and resolutions.(2) A qualified business may not claim or receive an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act if a 20250SB0384PN0395 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resident or business with a 20% or greater interest in that qualified business is not in full compliance with all State and local tax laws, ordinances and resolutions.(c) Later compliance and eligibility.--A resident or qualified business that is not eligible to claim an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit due to noncompliance with any State or local tax law may become eligible if that resident or qualified business subsequently comes into full compliance with all State and local tax laws to the satisfaction of the Department of Revenue or the political subdivision within the calendar year in which the noncompliance first occurred. If full compliance is not attained by February 5 of the calendar year following the calendar year during which noncompliance first occurred, that resident or qualified business is precluded from claiming any exemption, deduction, abatement or credit for that calendar year, whether or not full compliance is achieved subsequently.Section 904. Code compliance.(a) Compliance required.--A resident or qualified business shall be precluded from claiming an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit provided under this act if the resident or qualified business owns real property in a zone and the real property is not in compliance with all applicable State and local zoning, building and housing laws, ordinances or codes.(b) Opportunity to achieve compliance.--A resident or qualified business that is not in compliance under subsection (a) shall have until December 31 of the calendar year following designation of the real property as part of a zone to be in compliance in order to claim any State exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits for that year. If full compliance is not 20250SB0384PN0395 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attained by December 31 of that calendar year, the resident or qualified business is precluded from claiming any exemption, deduction or credit for that calendar year, whether or not compliance is achieved in a subsequent calendar year. The political subdivision may extend the time period in which a resident or qualified business must come into compliance with a local ordinance or building code for a period not to exceed one year if the political subdivision determines that the resident or qualified business has made and shall continue to make a good faith effort to come into compliance and that an extension will enable the resident or qualified business to achieve full compliance. A qualified political subdivision is required to notify the Department of Revenue in writing of each resident or qualified business not in compliance with this subsection within 30 days following the end of each calendar year.Section 905. Appeals.A resident or qualified business shall be deemed to be in compliance with any State or local tax for purposes of this section if that resident or qualified business had made a timely administrative or judicial appeal for that particular tax or has entered into and is in compliance with a duly authorized deferred payment plan with the Department of Revenue or political subdivision for that particular tax.Section 906. Notice requirements.(a) Requirement.--After compliance reviews have been conducted by appropriate Commonwealth and local authorities, the department shall notify each zone applicant by regular mail each year of the department's approval or denial of the applicant's zone application. A zone is not entitled to any tax benefits unless the zone receives approval from the department.20250SB0384PN0395 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Transmittal.--The department or the department's designated official shall, within 15 business days of receipt of a zone application made under this act, forward a copy of the application to the Department of Revenue, the Secretary of Agriculture, the Milk Marketing Board and any other appropriate Commonwealth and local authorities for review and processing.Section 907. Application time.(a) Requirement.--Except as provided under subsection (b), an applicant shall file an application in a manner prescribed by the department by December 31 of each calendar year for which the applicant claims an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act.(b) Extension or waiver.--Upon request of the applicant, the department may extend or waive the application deadline for good cause shown if the political subdivision does not object to the waiver or extension.(c) Approval.--An exemption, deduction, abatement or credit may not be claimed or received for that calendar year until approval has been granted by the department.CHAPTER 11PROCEDURES FOR ZONESSection 1101. Keystone opportunity dairy zone prioritizations.(a) Reduced interest.--Projects in a zone that is approved for Pennsylvania Industrial Development Authority or Small Business First financing shall receive the lowest interest rate extended to borrowers.(b) Priority consideration.--Projects in a zone shall receive priority consideration for State assistance under State community and economic development programs and for necessary approval required from the Department of Environmental 20250SB0384PN0395 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Protection.(c) Local governments.--The department shall provide technical assistance to political subdivisions relating to taxation, implementation of the opportunity plan, establishing annual benchmarks and annual reporting requirements.Section 1102. Reporting.The department shall report every four years to the General Assembly on the economic effects of this act in each zone.Section 1103. Other Commonwealth tax credits.(a) Limitation.--A resident or qualified business that is entitled to claim an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit in accordance with the provisions of this act shall not be entitled to claim or accumulate any of the following exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits that the resident or qualified business may otherwise have qualified for due to activity in the zone:(1) Provisions under the Tax Reform Code of 1971 of the following:(i) Article XVII-B relating to research and development tax credits.(ii) Article XIX-A relating to neighborhood assistance tax credits.(2) A job creation tax credit under the act of June 29, 1996 (P.L.434, No.67), known as the Job Enhancement Act.(b) Non-zone income.--The resident or qualified business may apply the exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits to income realized from activity or transactions outside the zone only for the taxable year to which the exemptions, deductions, abatements or credits apply. This subsection shall apply only to the taxes provided in Chapters 5 and 7.20250SB0384PN0395 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1104. Monitoring data.In addition to any other requirements of this act, the department shall monitor all of the following:(1) Verifiable job creation and job retention data.(2) Information on the types of jobs created and average hourly wages.(3) Number of years in the program.(4) Annual, unduplicated public and private capital investment amounts.(5) Description of dairy processing activities.(6) Types and amounts of other economic development assistance received from the department, if any.CHAPTER 13MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 1301. Illegal activity.Any funds or other forms of consideration received by a resident or qualified business conducting any type of illegal activity shall not be eligible for any of the exemptions, deductions, abatements and credits or any other benefits that are created under this act.Section 1302. Rules and regulations.The department, Department of Revenue and Department of Agriculture may promulgate regulations necessary to effectuate this act.Section 1303. Compliance.A resident or qualified business eligible for an exemption, deduction or credit under this act shall comply with all reporting, filing and compliance requirements under the Tax Reform Code of 1971 unless otherwise provided for in this act.Section 1304. Penalties.20250SB0384PN0395 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Civil penalty.--(1) In addition to any penalties authorized for violations under the Tax Reform Code of 1971, the Department of Revenue may impose an additional administrative penalty not to exceed $50,000 for any act or violation of this act relating to State and local taxes, including the filing of any false statement, return or document.(2) The department may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $50,000 for a violation of this act, including the filing of any false statement, return or document.(b) Criminal penalty.--In addition to any criminal penalty under the Tax Reform Code of 1971, a resident or qualified business that knowingly violates any provision of this act commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 1305. Construction.This act shall be interpreted to ensure that all provisions relating to State and local tax exemptions, deductions, abatements and credits are strictly construed in favor of the Commonwealth.Section 1306. Severability.The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application to a resident or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 1307. Repeals.All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 1308. Applicability.The provisions of this act shall be applied prospectively. A 20250SB0384PN0395 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resident or business may not claim an exemption, deduction, abatement or credit until that resident or business becomes qualified under this act and, in the case of a business, receives certification from the department that the business is qualified.Section 1309. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0384PN0395 - 34 - 1234567